Washington statutes.
RCW 11.48.130

Compromise of claims.

The court may authorize the personal representative, without the necessary nonintervention powers, to compromise and compound any claim owing the estate. Unless the court has restricted the power to compromise or compound claims owing to the estate and except as provided in RCW 11.68.090, a personal representative with nonintervention powers may compromise and compound a claim owing the estate without the intervention of the court.

[ 2021 c 140 s 4003; 1997 c 252 s 58; 1965 c 145 s 11.48.130. Prior: 1917 c 156 s 152; RRS s 1522; prior: Code 1881 s 1533; 1854 p 291 s 146.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: SPR 98.08W.

Application—2021 c 140 ss 4003-4017, 4023, 4024, and 4026: "(1) Sections 4003 through 4017, 4023, and 4024 of this act apply to all probate estates, regardless of whether the probate action commenced before or after July 25, 2021.

(2) Section 4026 of this act applies to all accounts established under chapter 11.114 RCW, regardless of whether the account was established before or after July 25, 2021." [ 2021 c 140 s 4027.]

Application—1997 c 252 ss 1-73: See note following RCW 11.02.005.